Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2443
Immunity.

(1) Any person or entity, including an immunosuppressant drug manufacturer, which exercises reasonable care in donating, accepting, distributing, or dispensing immunosuppressant drugs under the Immunosuppressant Drug Repository Program Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall be immune from civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary action of any kind for any injury, death, or loss to person or property relating to such activities.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the donation of an immunosuppressant drug by a drug manufacturer does not absolve the manufacturer of any criminal or civil liability that would have existed but for the donation, nor shall such donation increase the liability of such drug manufacturer that would have existed but for the donation.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 49.